District of Columbia statutes.
31-3422

Regulations.

The Commissioner, within 120 days of April 9, 1997, shall issue rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this chapter. To facilitate the timely issuance of rules and regulations, the Commissioner may contract out for the drafting of rules and regulations pursuant to emergency procurement provisions set forth in § 2-354.05.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-235, § 23, 44 DCR 818
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 215, 59 DCR 6190
1981 Ed., § 35-4522.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 substituted “set forth in § 2-354.05” for “set forth in § 2-303.12.”